extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX V2 Y 122
SFX V2 0 melu .
SFX V2 0 mela .
SFX V2 0 melo .
SFX V2 0 melos .
SFX V2 0 meles .
SFX V2 0 telu .
SFX V2 0 tela .
SFX V2 0 telo .
SFX V2 0 telos .
SFX V2 0 teles .
SFX V2 0 -ylu .
SFX V2 0 -yla .
SFX V2 0 -ylo .
SFX V2 0 -ylos .
SFX V2 0 -yles .
SFX V2 0 noslu [^s]
SFX V2 0 noslu [^o]s
SFX V2 0 noslu [^m]os
SFX V2 0 nosla [^s]
SFX V2 0 nosla [^o]s
SFX V2 0 nosla [^m]os
SFX V2 0 noslo [^s]
SFX V2 0 noslo [^o]s
SFX V2 0 noslo [^m]os
SFX V2 0 noslos [^s]
SFX V2 0 noslos [^o]s
SFX V2 0 noslos [^m]os
SFX V2 0 nosles [^s]
SFX V2 0 nosles [^o]s
SFX V2 0 nosles [^m]os
SFX V2 s noslu [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s nosla [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s noslo [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s noslos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s nosles [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 0 moslu [^s]
SFX V2 0 moslu [^o]s
SFX V2 0 moslu [^m]os
SFX V2 0 mosla [^s]
SFX V2 0 mosla [^o]s
SFX V2 0 mosla [^m]os
SFX V2 0 moslo [^s]
SFX V2 0 moslo [^o]s
SFX V2 0 moslo [^m]os
SFX V2 0 moslos [^s]
SFX V2 0 moslos [^o]s
SFX V2 0 moslos [^m]os
SFX V2 0 mosles [^s]
SFX V2 0 mosles [^o]s
SFX V2 0 mosles [^m]os
SFX V2 s moslu [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s mosla [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s moslo [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s moslos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s mosles [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 0 voslu .
SFX V2 0 vosla .
SFX V2 0 voslo .
SFX V2 0 voslos .
SFX V2 0 vosles .
SFX V2 0 -yoslu .
SFX V2 0 -yosla .
SFX V2 0 -yoslo .
SFX V2 0 -yoslos .
SFX V2 0 -yosles .
SFX V2 0 -yslu .
SFX V2 0 -ysla .
SFX V2 0 -yslo .
SFX V2 0 -yslos .
SFX V2 0 -ysles .
SFX V2 0 seme .
SFX V2 0 sete .
SFX V2 0 se-y .
SFX V2 0 senos .
SFX V2 0 semos .
SFX V2 0 sevos .
SFX V2 0 se-yos .
SFX V2 0 se-ys .
SFX V2 0 melu'l .
SFX V2 0 mela'l .
SFX V2 0 melo'l .
SFX V2 0 telu'l .
SFX V2 0 tela'l .
SFX V2 0 telo'l .
SFX V2 0 -ylu'l .
SFX V2 0 -yla'l .
SFX V2 0 -ylo'l .
SFX V2 0 noslu'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 noslu'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 noslu'l [^m]os
SFX V2 0 nosla'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 nosla'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 nosla'l [^m]os
SFX V2 0 noslo'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 noslo'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 noslo'l [^m]os
SFX V2 s noslu'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s nosla'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s noslo'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 0 moslu'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 moslu'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 moslu'l [^m]os
SFX V2 0 mosla'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 mosla'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 mosla'l [^m]os
SFX V2 0 moslo'l [^s]
SFX V2 0 moslo'l [^o]s
SFX V2 0 moslo'l [^m]os
SFX V2 s moslu'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s mosla'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 s moslo'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V2 0 voslu'l .
SFX V2 0 vosla'l .
SFX V2 0 voslo'l .
SFX V2 0 -yoslu'l .
SFX V2 0 -yosla'l .
SFX V2 0 -yoslo'l .
SFX V2 0 -yslu'l .
SFX V2 0 -ysla'l .
SFX V2 0 -yslo'l .
SFX V2 0 seme'l .
SFX V2 0 sete'l .

SFX V3 Y 16
SFX V3 0 me .
SFX V3 0 te .
SFX V3 0 -y .
SFX V3 0 vos .
SFX V3 0 -yos .
SFX V3 0 -ys .
SFX V3 0 lu .
SFX V3 0 la .
SFX V3 0 lo .
SFX V3 0 los .
SFX V3 0 les .
SFX V3 0 me'l .
SFX V3 0 te'l .
SFX V3 0 lu'l .
SFX V3 0 la'l .
SFX V3 0 lo'l .

SFX V4 Y 48
SFX V4 0 melu .
SFX V4 0 mela .
SFX V4 0 melo .
SFX V4 0 melos .
SFX V4 0 meles .
SFX V4 0 telu .
SFX V4 0 tela .
SFX V4 0 telo .
SFX V4 0 telos .
SFX V4 0 teles .
SFX V4 0 -ylu .
SFX V4 0 -yla .
SFX V4 0 -ylo .
SFX V4 0 -ylos .
SFX V4 0 -yles .
SFX V4 0 voslu .
SFX V4 0 vosla .
SFX V4 0 voslo .
SFX V4 0 voslos .
SFX V4 0 vosles .
SFX V4 0 -yoslu .
SFX V4 0 -yosla .
SFX V4 0 -yoslo .
SFX V4 0 -yoslos .
SFX V4 0 -yosles .
SFX V4 0 -yslu .
SFX V4 0 -ysla .
SFX V4 0 -yslo .
SFX V4 0 -yslos .
SFX V4 0 -ysles .
SFX V4 0 melu'l .
SFX V4 0 mela'l .
SFX V4 0 melo'l .
SFX V4 0 telu'l .
SFX V4 0 tela'l .
SFX V4 0 telo'l .
SFX V4 0 -ylu'l .
SFX V4 0 -yla'l .
SFX V4 0 -ylo'l .
SFX V4 0 voslu'l .
SFX V4 0 vosla'l .
SFX V4 0 voslo'l .
SFX V4 0 -yoslu'l .
SFX V4 0 -yosla'l .
SFX V4 0 -yoslo'l .
SFX V4 0 -yslu'l .
SFX V4 0 -ysla'l .
SFX V4 0 -yslo'l .

SFX V5 Y 22
SFX V5 0 te .
SFX V5 0 -y .
SFX V5 0 nos [^s]
SFX V5 0 nos [^o]s
SFX V5 0 nos [^m]os
SFX V5 s nos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V5 0 mos [^s]
SFX V5 0 mos [^o]s
SFX V5 0 mos [^m]os
SFX V5 s mos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V5 0 vos .
SFX V5 0 -yos .
SFX V5 0 -ys .
SFX V5 0 lu .
SFX V5 0 la .
SFX V5 0 lo .
SFX V5 0 los .
SFX V5 0 les .
SFX V5 0 te'l .
SFX V5 0 lu'l .
SFX V5 0 la'l .
SFX V5 0 lo'l .

SFX V6 Y 104
SFX V6 0 telu .
SFX V6 0 tela .
SFX V6 0 telo .
SFX V6 0 telos .
SFX V6 0 teles .
SFX V6 0 -ylu .
SFX V6 0 -yla .
SFX V6 0 -ylo .
SFX V6 0 -ylos .
SFX V6 0 -yles .
SFX V6 0 noslu [^s]
SFX V6 0 noslu [^o]s
SFX V6 0 noslu [^m]os
SFX V6 0 nosla [^s]
SFX V6 0 nosla [^o]s
SFX V6 0 nosla [^m]os
SFX V6 0 noslo [^s]
SFX V6 0 noslo [^o]s
SFX V6 0 noslo [^m]os
SFX V6 0 noslos [^s]
SFX V6 0 noslos [^o]s
SFX V6 0 noslos [^m]os
SFX V6 0 nosles [^s]
SFX V6 0 nosles [^o]s
SFX V6 0 nosles [^m]os
SFX V6 s noslu [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s nosla [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s noslo [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s noslos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s nosles [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 0 moslu [^s]
SFX V6 0 moslu [^o]s
SFX V6 0 moslu [^m]os
SFX V6 0 mosla [^s]
SFX V6 0 mosla [^o]s
SFX V6 0 mosla [^m]os
SFX V6 0 moslo [^s]
SFX V6 0 moslo [^o]s
SFX V6 0 moslo [^m]os
SFX V6 0 moslos [^s]
SFX V6 0 moslos [^o]s
SFX V6 0 moslos [^m]os
SFX V6 0 mosles [^s]
SFX V6 0 mosles [^o]s
SFX V6 0 mosles [^m]os
SFX V6 s moslu [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s mosla [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s moslo [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s moslos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s mosles [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 0 voslu .
SFX V6 0 vosla .
SFX V6 0 voslo .
SFX V6 0 voslos .
SFX V6 0 vosles .
SFX V6 0 -yoslu .
SFX V6 0 -yosla .
SFX V6 0 -yoslo .
SFX V6 0 -yoslos .
SFX V6 0 -yosles .
SFX V6 0 -yslu .
SFX V6 0 -ysla .
SFX V6 0 -yslo .
SFX V6 0 -yslos .
SFX V6 0 -ysles .
SFX V6 0 telu'l .
SFX V6 0 tela'l .
SFX V6 0 telo'l .
SFX V6 0 -ylu'l .
SFX V6 0 -yla'l .
SFX V6 0 -ylo'l .
SFX V6 0 noslu'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 noslu'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 noslu'l [^m]os
SFX V6 0 nosla'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 nosla'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 nosla'l [^m]os
SFX V6 0 noslo'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 noslo'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 noslo'l [^m]os
SFX V6 s noslu'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s nosla'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s noslo'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 0 moslu'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 moslu'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 moslu'l [^m]os
SFX V6 0 mosla'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 mosla'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 mosla'l [^m]os
SFX V6 0 moslo'l [^s]
SFX V6 0 moslo'l [^o]s
SFX V6 0 moslo'l [^m]os
SFX V6 s moslu'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s mosla'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 s moslo'l [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V6 0 voslu'l .
SFX V6 0 vosla'l .
SFX V6 0 voslo'l .
SFX V6 0 -yoslu'l .
SFX V6 0 -yosla'l .
SFX V6 0 -yoslo'l .
SFX V6 0 -yslu'l .
SFX V6 0 -ysla'l .
SFX V6 0 -yslo'l .

SFX V7 Y 23
SFX V7 0 me .
SFX V7 0 te .
SFX V7 0 -y .
SFX V7 0 nos [^s]
SFX V7 0 nos [^o]s
SFX V7 0 nos [^m]os
SFX V7 s nos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V7 0 mos [^s]
SFX V7 0 mos [^o]s
SFX V7 0 mos [^m]os
SFX V7 s mos [aeiáéí]mos
SFX V7 0 -yos .
SFX V7 0 -ys .
SFX V7 0 lu .
SFX V7 0 la .
SFX V7 0 lo .
SFX V7 0 los .
SFX V7 0 les .
SFX V7 0 me'l .
SFX V7 0 te'l .
SFX V7 0 lu'l .
SFX V7 0 la'l .
SFX V7 0 lo'l .
