extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
ábra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:abrir
ábran/XxV1V2 st:abrir
ábras/XxV7V8 st:abrir
ábre/XxV1V2 st:abrir
ábren/XxV1V2 st:abrir
ábres/XxV7V8 st:abrir
ábri/XxV1V2 st:abrir
ábro/XxV3V4 st:abrir
áides/XxV7V8 st:aidar
áida/XxV1V2 st:aidar
áiden/XxV1V2 st:aidar
áidan/XxV1V2 st:aidar
áido/XxV3V4 st:aidar
áides/XxV7V8 st:aidar
áidas/XxV7V8 st:aidar
áide/XxV1V2V3V4 st:aidar
áiden/XxV1V2 st:aidar
áidan/XxV1V2 st:aidar
álces/XxV7V8GaYs st:alzar
álza/XxV1V2GaYs st:alzar
álcen/XxV1V2GaYs st:alzar
álzo/XxV3V4GaYs st:alzar
álzas/XxV7V8GaYs st:alzar
álce/XxV1V2V3V4GaYs st:alzar
álzan/XxV1V2GaYs st:alzar
áta/XxV1V2Ys st:atar
áte/XxV3V4Ys st:atar
áten/XxV1V2Ys st:atar
átes/XxV7V8Ys st:atar
áto/XxV3V4Ys st:atar
cái/XxV2vS st:caer
cai/V1V2 st:cayer
conviéno/XxV1V2
cués/XxV2 st:coser
dá/XxV2 st:dar
dámos/XxV5V6 st:dar
dán/XxV2 st:dar
das/V7 st:dar
déa/XxV1V2V3V4 st:dar
déan/XxV1V2 st:dar
déas/XxV7V8 st:dar
desaviéno/XxV1V2
di/V3V7Ys st:dar st:dicir
dí/XxV4V8Ys st:dar st:dicir
diéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:dir
diéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:haber
dió/XxV2Ys st:dar
do/V3 st:dar
dó/XxV4 st:dar
dói/XxV4 st:dar
écha/XxV1V2 st:echar
éche/XxV1V2 st:echar
échen/XxV1V2 st:echar
éches/XxV7V8 st:echar
écho/XxV3V4 st:echar
éntro/XxV3V4GaYs st:entrar
éntres/XxV7V8GaYs st:entrar
éntra/XxV1V2GaYs st:entrar
éntren/XxV1V2GaYs st:entrar
éntre/XxV1V2V3V4GaYs st:entrar
éntran/XxV1V2GaYs st:entrar
fó/V2 st:dir
fó/V2 st:ser
fói/V2 st:dir
fói/V2 st:ser
fómos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fómos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fóra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:dir
fóra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:ser
fóramos/V5V6 st:dir
fóramos/V5V6 st:ser
fóran/XxV1V2 st:dir
fóran/XxV1V2 st:ser
fóras/XxV7V8 st:dir
fóras/XxV7V8 st:ser
fóre/XxV1V2V3V4 st:dir
fóre/XxV1V2V3V4 st:ser
fóremos/V5V6 st:dir
fóremos/V5V6 st:ser
fóren/XxV1V2 st:dir
fóren/XxV1V2 st:ser
fóres/XxV7V8 st:dir
fóres/XxV7V8 st:ser
fóron/XxV1V2 st:dir
fóron/XxV1V2 st:ser
fósti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fósti/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuémos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fuémos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fuéra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:dir
fuéra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:ser
fuéramos/V5V6 st:dir
fuéramos/V5V6 st:ser
fuéras/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuéras/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuére/XxV1V2V3V4 st:dir
fuére/XxV1V2V3V4 st:ser
fuéremos/V5V6 st:dir
fuéremos/V5V6 st:ser
fuéres/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuéres/XxV7V8 st:ser
fuéron/XxV1V2 st:dir
fuéron/XxV1V2 st:ser
fuésti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuésti/XxV7V8 st:ser
fui/V3 st:dir 
fui/V3Ys st:ser 
fuí/XxV4 st:dir
fuí/XxV4 st:ser
fuímos/XxV5V6 st:dir
fuímos/XxV5V6 st:ser
fuísti/XxV7V8 st:dir
fuísti/XxV7V8 st:ser
há/XxV2Ga st:haber
habémos/XxV5V6Ga st:haber
hái/XxV2Ga st:haber
hán/V2Ga st:haber
has/V7Ga st:haber 
he/V3Ga st:haber 
hé/XxV4Ga st:haber
hémos/XxV5V6Ga st:haber
interviéno/XxV1V2Ga
ódie/XxV1V2V3V4 st:odiar
ódien/XxV1V2 st:odiar
ódies/XxV7V8 st:odiar
ódia/XxV1V2 st:odiar
odiámos/XxV5V6 st:odiar
ódian/XxV1V2 st:odiar
ódias/XxV7V8 st:odiar
ódio/XxV3V4 st:odiar
óya/XxV1V2V3V4Ys st:oyer
óyan/XxV1V2Ys st:oyer
óyas/XxV7V8Ys st:oyer
óye/XxV1V2Ys st:oyer
óyen/XxV1V2Ys st:oyer
óigo/XxV3V4 st:oyer
óiga/XxV1V2V3V4 st:oyer
óigas/XxV7V8 st:oyer
óigan/XxV1V2 st:oyer
ói/XxV2 st:oyer
óin/XxV2 st:oyer
óyes/XxV7V8Ys st:oyer
óyi/XxV1V2 st:oyer
oí/V1V2 st:oyer
oísti/V7V8 st:oyer
óyo/XxV3V4Ys st:oyer
perviéno/XxV1V2
pués/XxV2 st:poder
pué/XxV2 st:poder
puén/XxV2 st:poder
previéno/XxV1V2
proviéno/XxV1V2
rái/XxV2vS st:raer
rai/V1V2 st:rayer
reviéno/XxV1V2
río/V3V4 st:rir
ris/V7 st:rir
ri/V1V3 st:rir
rí/XxV2V4 st:rir
rímos/XxV5V6 st:rir
rín/XxV2 st:rir
ría/V1V2V3V4 st:rir
rías/V7V8 st:rir
riámos/XxV5V6 st:rir
rían/V1V2 st:rir
risti/V7 st:rir
riésti/XxV7V8 st:rir
rió/V1V2 st:rir
rímos/XxV5V6 st:rir
riémos/XxV5V6 st:rir
riéron/XxV1V2 st:rir
riéra/XxV1V2V3V4 st:rir
riére/XxV1V2V3V4 st:rir
riéras/XxV7V8 st:rir
riéres/XxV7V8 st:rir
riéramos/V5V6 st:rir
riéremos/V5V6 st:rir
riéran/XxV1V2 st:rir
riéren/XxV1V2 st:rir
siéndo/V1V2V7V8 st:ser
sío/V1V2V7V8 st:ser 
so/V3 st:ser
só/XxV4 st:ser
sobreviéno/XxV1V2
soi/V3Ys st:ser 
sói/XxV4 st:ser
sómos/XxV5V6 st:ser
són/V2 st:ser
tá/XxV2 st:tar
támos/XxV5V6 st:tar
tán/V1V2 st:tar
tándo/V1V2V7V8 st:tar
tao/V1V2V7V8 st:tar 
tas/V7 st:tar
ten/V7Ys st:tener
téo/XxV3V4 st:tener
tévi/XxV3V4Ys st:tar st:tener
tévo/XxV1V2Ys st:tar st:tener
tién/XxV2Ys st:tener
to/V3 st:tar
tó/XxV4 st:tar
tói/XxV4 st:tar
trái/XxV2vS st:traer
trai/V1V2 st:trayer
úfra/XxV1V2V3V4Ys st:ufrir
úfran/XxV1V2Ys st:ufrir
úfras/XxV7V8Ys st:ufrir
úfre/XxV1V2Ys st:ufrir
úfren/XxV1V2Ys st:ufrir
úfres/XxV7V8Ys st:ufrir
úfro/XxV3V4Ys st:ufrir
únvia/XxV1V2Ga st:unviar
únvian/XxV1V2Ga st:unviar
únvias/XxV7V8Ga st:unviar
únvie/XxV1V2V3V4Ga st:unviar
únvien/XxV1V2Ga st:unviar
únvies/XxV7V8/Ga st:unviar
únvio/XxV3V4Ga st:unviar
úsa/XxV1V2 st:usar
úsan/XxV1V2 st:usar
úsas/XxV7V8 st:usar
úse/XxV1V2V3V4 st:usar
úsen/XxV1V2 st:usar
úses/XxV7V8 st:usar
úso/XxV3V4 st:usar
vá/XxV2 st:dir
vámos/XxV5V6 st:dir
ván/XxV2 st:dir
vas/V7 st:dir
viéramos/LlV5V6 st:ver
viéran/LlXxV1V2 st:ver
viére/LlXxV1V2V3V4 st:ver
viéres/LlXxV7V8 st:ver
ví/XXYsV2
vién/XxV2Ys st:venir
vo/V3 st:dir
vó/XxV4 st:dir
voi/LlV3 st:dir 
vói/XxV4 st:dir
yé/XxV2 st:ser
yes/V7 st:ser
